Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2070.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Supplemental appropriation; Gila county; flood relief efforts; reports; exemption A. In addition to any other appropriation made in fiscal year 2025-2026, the sum of $25,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2025-2026 to the department of administration to distribute to Gila county for flood relief efforts. Gila county may spend the monies for: 1. Flood prevention. 2. Capital expenditures and equipment associated with flood prevention. 3. Mitigation projects to address flooding and other damages as a result of flooding. 4. Debris removal, sediment clearance and environmental cleanup activities directly related to flood damage. 5. The county's or a local government agency's emergency liabilities as a result of flooding, including intergovernmental agreements or contracts with cities, towns or special districts. 6. Engineering, design, permitting and project management costs. 7. Financial assistance to public and private landowners for emergency repairs for infrastructure damage caused by flooding. 8. Matching monies for federal or state grant programs that address flood damage, mitigation or resiliency. 9. Reimbursement to a state agency or political subdivision for costs for eligible claims arising from an emergency declaration pursuant to section 35-192, Arizona Revised Statutes, or a federal declaration of emergency or major disaster. 10. Not more than three percent of the appropriation made in this subsection may be spent by Gila county for administrative expenses incurred for the management, compliance and reporting required pursuant to this section. 11. Economic development infrastructure in areas impacted by flooding. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section shall be used to supplement and not supplant any monies allocated by the federal government for this purpose. Gila county shall seek federal reimbursement as appropriate for expenditures made from this appropriation. Any reimbursements shall be credited to this appropriation. C. Gila county shall distribute monies pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 7 of this section only as a payor of last resort after all other sources of payment, including any federal and insurance reimbursements, have been exhausted. D. Not later than fifteen days after the end of each month, Gila county shall submit a report to the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives and the joint legislative budget committee on expenditures from and reimbursements to the appropriation made in subsection A of this section for the prior month and shall provide a copy to the secretary of state. Each report shall include information regarding the total expenditures and reimbursements for each paragraph listed in subsection A of this section and the amount of monies remaining in the appropriation. E. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations. Sec. 2. Emergency This act is an emergency measure that is necessary to preserve the public peace, health or safety and is operative immediately as provided by law.